Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-1446.01
Committee; certain expenditure of funds authorized.

(1) No committee, other than a political party committee, may expend funds except to make an expenditure, as defined in subsection (1), (2), or (3) of section 49-1419, or as provided in section 49-1446.03 or 49-1469.06.

(2) A candidate committee of an officeholder may make expenditures for the payment of installation and use of telephone and telefax machines located in an officeholder's public office and used by such officeholder.

(3) Any committee, including a political party committee, may invest funds in investments authorized for the state investment officer in the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Nothing in this section shall prohibit a separate segregated political fund from disbursing funds as provided in section 49-1469.06.

Laws 1981, LB 134, § 5;

Laws 1988, LB 1136, § 2;

Laws 1988, LB 1174, § 1;

Laws 1992, LB 722, § 1;

Laws 1994, LB 1066, § 39;

Laws 1997, LB 49, § 8;

Laws 2002, LB 1086, § 3;

Laws 2005, LB 242, § 9.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.